Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB658.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 335.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is the purpose and policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky to protect the public
from being misled by incompetent and unauthorized persons, and from
unprofessional conduct on the part of qualified social workers by providing
regulatory authority over persons who hold themselves out to the public as social
workers.
(2) The purpose of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 is to promote high
standards of professional performance for those engaged in the profession of social
work by regulating the title, and by setting standards of qualification, training, and
experience for those who seek to engage in the practice of social work.
(3) Nothing contained in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 shall be
applicable to employees of the State Department of Education or local boards of
education who meet the certification requirements in the area of social work as
established, or which may be established, by the Kentucky Board of Education. Nor
shall anything in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 be construed to apply
to, limit, or restrict the regulation of the title, setting of standards, qualifications,
training, or experience of those who seek to engage in the practice of social work
and who have been, or will be, certified by the Kentucky Board of Education for the
position for which they have been employed.
(4) Nothing contained in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 shall require
persons employed by the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the director or
administrative head of a social service agency or division of a city, county or urban-
county government, or applicants for such employment to be licensed.
(5) (a) Nothing contained in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 shall require
persons employed by an organization that is exempt from federal income
Page 1 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and provides
evidence of its tax-exempt status, to be licensed.
(b) The provisions of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990 shall not be
construed to apply to, limit, or restrict the regulation of the title, setting of
standards, qualifications, training, and experience of those engaged as
employees of a tax-exempt organization in the practice of social work.
(c) The exemption provided in this subsection shall not apply to the practice of
clinical social work, which shall be undertaken only by a certified social
worker licensed pursuant to KRS 335.080 or a licensed clinical social worker
licensed pursuant to KRS 335.100.
(6) Nothing contained in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990 shall prohibit volunteer
health practitioners from providing services under KRS 39A.350 to 39A.366.[
(7) Beginning on July 12, 2012, and continuing through December 31, 2016, there shall
exist an amnesty period during which no disciplinary action, administrative fees, or
fines shall be imposed by the board for unlicensed practice against an individual
who is currently serving or who formerly served as an employee of a tax-exempt
organization specified in subsection (5) of this section.]
Section 2. KRS 335.020 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Social Work;[.]
(2) "Practice of clinical social work" means the practice of social work, as defined in
subsection (3) of this section, which requires the application of specialized
clinical knowledge and advanced clinical skills in the areas of assessment,
diagnosis, evidence-based interventions, research, and treatment of mental,
emotional, and behavioral disorders, conditions, and addictions; and
(3) "[The ]Practice of social work" means:
(a) The application of social work theory, knowledge, methods, ethics, training,
Page 2 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
evidence-based interventions, research, and the professional use of self to:
1. Restore or enhance social, psychosocial, or biopsychosocial
functioning of individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
and communities; or[professional activity of helping for remuneration
individuals, groups, or communities enhance or restore their capacity for
social functioning and create societal conditions favorable to this goal. It
includes the professional application of social work values, principles,
and techniques to one or more of the following ends: counseling and
nonmedical psychotherapy with individuals, families, and groups;
helping people obtain tangible services; assisting communities or
groups]
2. Provide or improve social and health services; and
(b) Engaging in social work education, research, planning, and the appropriate
administration of social work or social welfare services.
Section 3. KRS 335.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The board shall administer and enforce the provisions of KRS 335.010 to
335.160 and KRS 335.990, and shall evaluate applications and issue licenses
to qualified applicants within forty-five (45) days of submission of the
complete application packet and receipt of the official passing score report
and the licensure fee.
(b) Within fifteen (15) days of accepting an applicant's payment and application
packet, the board shall:
1. Notify the applicant that the application packet is complete, approve the
applicant to sit for the national examination, and issue a temporary
permit to engage in the practice of social work; or
2. Notify the applicant that the application packet is incomplete and, when
all omitted application items are received, notify the applicant of receipt
Page 3 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
of the complete application packet, approve the applicant to sit for the
national examination, and issue a temporary permit to engage in the
practice of social work.
(c) The board shall evaluate the complete application packet and, within forty-
five (45) days, notify a qualified applicant of the issuance of the permanent
license pursuant to KRS 335.080, 335.090, or 335.100.
(d) If the board deems an applicant unqualified, the license may be denied and the
temporary permit to practice social work may be revoked.
(e) In order to be issued a temporary permit, an applicant shall have submitted:
1. A complete application packet as provided in this subsection, with the
exception of a passing score on the required examination; and
2. If applying for licensure as a certified social worker or as a licensed
clinical social worker, a letter from a licensed clinical social worker, or
equivalent, who will supervise the applicant while under temporary
permit in accordance with administrative regulations.
(2) The board may issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, pay appropriate witness fees,
administer oaths, and investigate allegations of practices violating the provision of
KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990.
(3) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[pursuant
to] KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and
KRS 335.990.
(4) The board may conduct hearings pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B and keep records
and minutes necessary to carry out the functions of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and
KRS 335.990.
(5) The board may employ any other persons it deems necessary to carry on the work
of the board, and shall define their duties and fix their compensation.
(6) The board may renew licenses and require continuing education as a condition for
Page 4 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
license renewals, and shall authorize organizations to provide continuing education
programs, including but not limited to:
(a) Schools of social work accredited by the Council on Social Work Education;
(b) The National Association of Social Workers-Kentucky Chapter; and
(c) The Kentucky Society of Clinical Social Workers.
(7) The board may, after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B,
revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue or renew; impose probationary or supervisory
conditions upon; impose administrative fines; issue written reprimands and
admonishments; or any combination of actions regarding licenses and licensees.
(8) The board may seek injunctive relief in Franklin Circuit Court to stop the unlawful
practice of social work by unlicensed persons.
(9) The board may establish, by promulgation of administrative regulations, the
requirements for temporary permits to practice social work.
(10) The board may establish, by promulgation of administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, the requirements for provisional licenses to
practice social work for students enrolled in a bachelor's degree, master's degree,
or doctorate degree program in social work from an educational institution
accredited by the Council on Social Work Education.
(11) The board may enter into agreements with any organization for the creation and
implementation of a social work impairment program, as specified in the
agreement.
(12)[(11)] The board shall refund any levied administrative assessments that it has
received for practice by unlicensed individuals employed by organizations
exempted from the application of KRS 335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990 by KRS
335.010(5).
Section 4. KRS 335.080 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license as "certified social worker" to an applicant who
Page 5 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
meets the following requirements:
(a) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) [Is a person of good moral character;
(c) ]Has received a master's degree or doctorate degree in social work from an
educational institution approved by the board;
(c)[(d)] Has paid to the board an examination fee established by the board by
promulgation of an administrative regulation;
(d)[(e)] Has passed an examination approved[prepared] by the board;[
(f) Has not within the preceding three (3) months failed to pass an examination
given by the board;] and
(e)[(g)] Has paid an initial license fee established by the board by promulgation
of an administrative regulation.
(2) The license shall be displayed in the licensee's principal place of practice or
displayed virtually if practicing via telehealth, and shall entitle the licensee to hold
himself or herself forth to the public as providing services as authorized by KRS
335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990.
(3) A certified social worker may engage in the practice of clinical social work by
contracting, in writing, with a licensed clinical social worker who shall assume
responsibility for and supervise the certified social worker's practice as directed by
the board by promulgation of administrative regulations. The certified social worker
shall, for purposes of this section, be an employee of an institution or organization
in which the certified social worker has no direct or indirect interest other than
employment. No certified social worker shall enter into a practice of clinical social
work until this contract has been approved by the board, and shall cease the practice
of clinical social work immediately upon the termination of the contract. At the
termination of the contract, the certified social worker shall apply for licensure as a
licensed clinical social worker or request an extension of the contract from the
Page 6 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
board.
Section 5. KRS 335.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license as "licensed social worker" to an applicant who
meets the following requirements:
(a) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) [Is a person of good moral character;
(c) ]1. Has received a baccalaureate degree in a social work or social welfare
program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; or
2. Has received a baccalaureate degree and has completed courses
equivalent to a social work or social welfare program as determined by
the board;
(c)[(d)] Has paid to the board an examination fee established by the board by
promulgation of an administrative regulation;
(d)[(e)] Has passed an examination approved[prepared] by the board;[
(f) Has not within the preceding three (3) months failed to pass an examination
given by the board;] and
(e)[(g)] Has paid an initial license fee established by the board by promulgation
of an administrative regulation.
(2) The license shall be displayed in the licensee's principal place of practice or
displayed virtually if practicing via telehealth, and shall entitle the licensee to hold
himself or herself forth to the public as providing services as authorized by KRS
335.010 to 335.160 and 335.990.
Section 6. KRS 335.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license as "licensed clinical social worker" to an applicant
who meets the following requirements:
(a) Has received a master's degree or doctoral degree in social work from an
educational institution accredited by the Council on Social Work
Page 7 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
Education[approved by the board];
(b) Has had a minimum of two (2) years of [full time post-master's experience,
consisting of at least thirty (30) hours per week, or three (3) years of part time,
consisting of at least twenty (20) hours per week, ]post-master's degree
experience acceptable to the board in the use of specialty methods and
measures to be employed in clinical social work practice, the experience
having been acquired under appropriate supervision as established by the
board by promulgation of an administrative regulation;
(c) Has paid to the board an examination fee established by the board by
promulgation of an administrative regulation;
(d) Has passed an examination approved[prepared] by the board for this purpose;[
(e) Has not within the preceding three (3) months failed to pass an examination
given by the board;] and
(e)[(f)] Has paid an initial license fee established by the board by promulgation
of an administrative regulation.
(2) The license shall be displayed in the licensee's principal place of practice or
displayed virtually if practicing via telehealth, and shall entitle the licensee to hold
himself or herself forth to the public as providing services as authorized by KRS
335.010 to 335.160 and KRS 335.990.
(3) A licensed clinical social worker may contract with a certified social worker in the
practice of clinical social work as provided in KRS 335.080(3). The licensed
clinical social worker shall assume responsibility for and supervise the certified
social worker's practice as directed by the board by promulgation of administrative
regulations.
Section 7. KRS 335.158 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Client" means:
Page 8 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
1. An individual, family, or group who receives social work services from
a social worker;
2. A corporate entity, school, or other organization, if the social worker
is employed or contracted to provide a social work service or benefit
directly to the corporate entity, school, or other organization, or its
individual members; or
3. A legal guardian who is responsible for making decisions regarding
the provision of social work services to a minor or legally incompetent
adult;
(b) "Social work services" means the application of social work theory,
knowledge, methods, ethics, and the professional use of self to restore or
enhance social, psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals,
couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities through the care
and services provided by a social worker through both in-person and virtual
care or services via technology, including telehealth in accordance with this
section;
(c) "Social worker" means an individual:
1. Licensed as a:
a. Certified social worker pursuant to Section 4 of this Act;
b. Licensed social worker pursuant to Section 5 of this Act; or
c. Licensed clinical social worker pursuant to Section 6 of this Act;
or
2. Issued a temporary permit under Section 3 of this Act; and
(d) "Telehealth":
1. Means the use of interactive audio, video, or other electronic media to
deliver health care; and
2. Includes the use of electronic media for diagnosis, consultation,
Page 9 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
treatment, transfer of health or medical data, and continuing
education.
(2) A client shall be deemed to continue to be a client for a period of five (5) years
following the last:
(a) Date of service rendered to the individual, family, group, or legal guardian;
or
(b) Day of employment or contract for services to a corporate entity, school, or
other organization.
(3) A social worker who provides or facilitates the use of telehealth shall:
(a) Ensure that the informed consent of the client, or another appropriate person
with authority to make the health care treatment decision for the client, is
obtained before services are provided through telehealth;
(b) Ensure that the confidentiality of the client's medical information is
maintained as required by this chapter and other applicable state and federal
law. At a minimum, confidentiality shall be maintained through appropriate
processes, practices, and technology that conform to applicable state and
federal law, including but not limited to the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as amended;
(c) Comply with Section 508 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, 29
U.S.C. sec. 794(d), to allow telehealth services accessible to a client with
disabilities;
(d) Disclose to the client the potential risks to privacy and confidentiality of
information due to the use of technology, including:
1. The potential risks of disruption in the use of technology;
2. When and how the social worker utilizes electronic messages;
3. The circumstances in which the social worker may utilize alternative
modes of communication for emergency purposes, including medical,
Page 10 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
psychiatric, and other emergencies;
4. The identity of anyone who may have access to client communications
with the social worker; and
5. The identity of the social worker, his or her credentials, and the
jurisdiction of licensed practice;
(e)[(d)] Assess the client's current condition and needs to determine the
appropriateness of telehealth in meeting those needs and that the client has the
necessary knowledge and skill to benefit from telehealth;
(f)[(e)] Adhere to the same or appropriately adapted standards of care as when
treatment or services are provided in person;
(g)[(f)] Not engage in fee-splitting with other telehealth providers or entities;
(h)[(g)] Not engage in false, misleading, or deceptive advertising of telehealth
services; and
(i)[(h)] Beginning on July 1, 2025, complete a board-approved two (2) hour
training course on the use of telehealth to provide social work services.
(4)[(2)] Each time a social worker provides or facilitates services via telehealth, the
social worker shall:
(a) Make a reasonable attempt to verify the identity of the client;
(b) Make a reasonable attempt to verify and document the physical location of the
client at the time services are provided;
(c) Obtain from the client alternative means of contacting the client;
(d) Provide information on how communication can be directed to the social
worker;
(e) Utilize non-public facing technology products that comply with the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 standards in 42 U.S.C.
secs. 1320d to 1320d-9, except when the client, after being duly informed of
the risks in writing or through a documented conversation, has requested to
Page 11 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
use nonsecure communication methods, and the social worker has
documented the client's request and informed consent in the client's record;
and
(f) Document in the client's record that a service was provided via telehealth,
including any technological difficulties experienced during the provision of
the service and adherence to all appropriate standards of care.
(5) Any person located within or outside of Kentucky who provides social work
services via telehealth to a client in Kentucky, and any person located in
Kentucky who provides social work services via telehealth to a client outside of
Kentucky, shall:
(a) Hold a temporary permit issued under Section 3 of this Act;
(b) Be licensed under Section 4, 5, or 6 of this Act; or
(c) Be licensed to provide social work services by a member state, as defined in
KRS 335.135, in a jurisdiction that has enacted the Social Work Licensure
Compact.
(6) A social worker shall comply with the laws, administrative regulations, and
professional standards relating to licensing, telehealth, mandatory reporting, duty
to warn, age of consent, and other requirements for the provision of social work
services of:
(a) The Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Any jurisdiction in which the social worker is located, including a
temporary location; and
(c) Any jurisdiction in which a client is located at the time the social worker
provides social work services via telehealth.
(7) A social worker employed by a federal agency, including but not limited to the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs, may provide social work services
via telehealth to clients of the federal agency regardless of the social worker's or
Page 12 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
client's location, as permitted under federal law for telehealth practice when
performed within the scope of social worker's employment.
(8) A social worker who is temporarily or permanently located outside of the United
States may provide social work services via telehealth to clients in Kentucky, and
a social worker located in Kentucky may provide social work services via
telehealth to clients who are temporarily or permanently located outside of the
United States, if the social worker:
(a) Complies with Kentucky laws and administrative regulations governing the
practice of social work and provision of social work services via telehealth;
(b) Complies with the laws and professional standards governing the practice of
social work and provision of social work services via telehealth of the
foreign country in which the social worker or client is located;
(c) Complies with all United States laws and international agreements that
apply to the provision of telehealth services; and
(d) Ensures the secure and compliant handling of client information in
accordance with applicable United States and international data protection
standards, such as the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as amended, and the General Data Protection
Regulation, Regulation (EU) 2016/679.
[(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a social worker employed or
contracted in Kentucky to answer and respond to national 988 crisis line calls
to the extent that the provisions of this section are in conflict with the
requirements and training provided by the crisis line service provider.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Client" means:
1. An individual, family, or group who receives social work services from a
social worker;
Page 13 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
2. A corporate entity or other organization, if the social worker is contracted to
provide a social work service of benefit directly to the corporate entity or
organization; or
3. A legal guardian who is responsible for making decisions regarding the
provision of social work services to a minor or legally incompetent adult;
(b) "Social worker" means an individual licensed as a:
1. Certified social worker pursuant to KRS 335.080;
2. Licensed social worker pursuant to KRS 335.090; or
3. Licensed clinical social worker pursuant to KRS 335.100; and
(c) "Telehealth" means the use of interactive audio, video, or other electronic
media to deliver health care. It includes the use of electronic media for
diagnosis, consultation, treatment, transfer of health or medical data, and
continuing education.]
Section 8. KRS 387.610 is amended to read as follows:
Prior to the expiration of a term of guardianship or conservatorship, the limited guardian,
guardian, limited conservator, or conservator may petition, pursuant to KRS 387.620, for
a renewal of his appointment for a period not to exceed five (5) years. The petition shall
be accompanied by verified affidavits of a physician, an advanced practice registered
nurse or physician assistant working within his or her scope of practice, or a psychologist
licensed or certified under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319, or a person licensed or
certified as a social worker or an employee of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services
who meets the qualifications of KRS 335.080(1)(a) and[,] (b)[, and (c)] or 335.090(1)(a)
and[,] (b)[, and (c)], supporting the need for the continuation of the guardianship or
conservatorship.
Section 9. KRS 457.090 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A power of attorney is effective when executed unless the principal provides in the
power of attorney that it becomes effective at a future date or upon the occurrence
Page 14 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1146
of a future event or contingency.
(2) If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the occurrence of a future event or
contingency, the principal, in the power of attorney, may authorize one (1) or more
persons to determine in a writing or other record that the event or contingency has
occurred.
(3) If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the principal's incapacity and the
principal has not authorized a person to determine whether the principal is
incapacitated, or the person authorized is unable or unwilling to make the
determination, the power of attorney becomes effective upon a determination in a
writing or other record by:
(a) A physician, an advanced practice registered nurse, a psychologist licensed or
certified under the provisions of KRS Chapter 319, or a person licensed or
certified as a social worker or an employee of the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services who meets the qualifications of KRS 335.080(1)(a) and[,]
(b)[, and (c)] or 335.090(1)(a) and[,] (b)[, and (c)], that the principal is
incapacitated within the meaning of KRS 457.020(5)(a); or
(b) An attorney-at-law or a judge that the principal is incapacitated within the
meaning of KRS 457.020(5)(b).
(4) A person authorized by the principal in the power of attorney to determine that the
principal is incapacitated may act as the principal's personal representative pursuant
to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, Sections 1171 to 1179
of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d, as amended, and applicable
regulations, to obtain access to the principal's health-care information and
communicate with the principal's health-care provider for the sole purpose of
determining whether the principal is incapacitated, unless the power of attorney
otherwise provides.
Page 15 of 15
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:31 AM Jacketed